Utah statutes.
61-2d-112.   Notice of information available to borrowers.

(1)  In addition to any other notice or disclosure a lender or title company may provide to a borrower seeking, obtaining, or inquiring about a high-cost mortgage, the lender shall provide the borrower any brochure or other document information prepared by a federal or state authority in a form intended to inform consumers about home loans or consumer credit on financing or educational resources on financing.

(2)  The requirement set forth in Subsection (1) may include:

(a)  the posting, in a public area of the office, notice indicating that educational resources are available;

(b)  a list of educational opportunities or programs offered in the surrounding area including the program name and phone number;

(c)  a printed brochure or booklet on responsible lending and borrowing available to the borrower at no charge; or

(d)  information from the Department of Financial Institutions on its responsible consumer financial educational program.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2004 General Session

